Hawaii statutes.
§580-23 Former husband or wife living.
A marriage may be declared null on the ground that one of the parties has an
undivorced husband or wife living, on the application of either of the parties
during the lifetime of the other, or on the application of the former husband
or wife. [CC 1859, §1315; RL 1925, §2957; RL 1935, §4452; RL 1945, §12203; RL
1955, §324-3; HRS §580-23]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next